lexd_components/hye-nouns_paradigms.lexd
# գինու  գինուց գինով գինում
NounRegPolyIFinalZeroChanged_U_Uts NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  CaseDefUDeclensionWithOvertcase

#  գինիով  գինիում, րաֆֆի-ի րաֆֆի-ից
NounRegPolyIFinalZeroBase_U_Uts NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR

# գինիներ
NounRegPolyIFinalZeroBase_U_Uts NZero NouNinflBoundary  RegNounPluralFormDeclension


PATTERN RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithReqDef
#This is for singular case/def inflection where both either case or  def is required
#This is like substantivized nouns where the bare form is not interpreted as a noun
# without case
Def|Poss
# with case, with/without definite
CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase

##########################
##########################


PATTERN NounDeclIrregularU
#This is for nouns and function words that take u-declension
#This don't have high vowels that can reduce
#This is a closet set of nouns
# Does not include infinitivals because infinitivals cant be bare
#Singular ձի ձիու ձիուց
UNounStemBoundary NSg0 CaseDefUDeclension
UNounStemBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclension  # Dir/LR



#Plural
UNounStemBoundary RegPluralDeclension

PATTERN UNounStemBoundary
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary
#GAGA GAGA!	Number1 [<num>:]  SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary
#GAGA GAGA!	QuantifierU  [<prn><qnt>:] 


##########################
##########################

PATTERN InfinitivalDecl
#For declined infinitivals, I assume they're not pluralized
#I don't add the reduction boundary as a safety precaution
#I make bare infinitival get analyezd as just a verb
#TO DO: I don't think they can take attributive, but I put them here just to be safe

#Singular caseless definite and attributive
InfinitivalDeclStem  NSg0 DeclUWithFixedDef
#GAGA GAGA!	#Plural possessive
#GAGA GAGA!	InfinitivalDeclStem   PluralPossessiveDeclension


PATTERN InfinitivalDeclStem
Infinitival
:Neg Infinitival Neg:





######################
######################



#GAGA GAGA!	PATTERN NounTimeVanAdvStem
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero

#GAGA GAGA!	PATTERN NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvStem SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
#GAGA GAGA!	[երբ<prn>:երբ] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])   SubstZero NouNinflBoundary 


PATTERN NounTimeVanStemBaseNoOrYesU
NounTimeVan 
NounTimeVanBase
NounTimeVanU 
NounTimeVanUReducedBase 

NounTimeVanIrigunBase

PATTERN NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun
NounTimeVan
NounTimeVanReduced
NounTimeVanU 
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced 

NounTimeVanIrigunReduced

PATTERN NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithoutIrigun
NounTimeVan
NounTimeVanReduced
NounTimeVanU 
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced 

PATTERN NounTimeVanStemReducedYesU
NounTimeVanU  
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced  

PATTERN NounDeclIrregularTimeVan
#optional normal case
#ժամ takes the above and dative ու

# մահ ամիս
NounTimeVanStemBaseNoOrYesU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
# մահվա  ամսվա
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVa  
# definite մահ-վա-ն մահ-վան-ս ամս-վա-ն ամս-վան-ս
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVan Poss
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVa Def  
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVan Def # Dir/LR
# մահու ամսու
NounTimeVanStemReducedYesU  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefUDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR
# մահվան
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVan # Dir/LR

# մահվանից ամսվանից իրիկվանից
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVan AblReg Poss?
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVan AblReg Def? # Dir/LR
# ամսից
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithoutIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AblReg (Def|Poss) # Dir/LR
# ամսով ամսում
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithoutIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InsReg|LocReg Poss?
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithoutIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InsReg|LocReg Def? # Dir/LR
# իրիկունով
NounTimeVanIrigunBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InsReg|LocReg Poss?
NounTimeVanIrigunBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InsReg|LocReg Def? # Dir/LR

# մահվամբ
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanInsVamp (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR 
# մահվա-ս
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVanDatGenSuffixVa Poss # Dir/LR

# ամիսի ամսի, զատիկի զատկի
NounTimeVanStemBaseNoOrYesU NZero NouNinflBoundary  CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanStemBaseNoOrYesU NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed  CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR

#Plural
NounTimeVanStemBaseNoOrYesU NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension 


#Singular attributive
#The ուանէ form is preferably treated as attributive
NounTimeVanStemReducedNoOrYesUWithIrigun NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan





#GAGA GAGA!	#For irregulars among the time words
#GAGA GAGA!	#For irregulars derived from adverbs like այսօր
#GAGA GAGA!	#Bare adverb
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvStem
#GAGA GAGA!	#Without case, but with definite
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)
#GAGA GAGA!	#With case
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
#GAGA GAGA!	#with possible case-boundary m like շատոնցմէ
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 CaseBoundaryM CaseRegObliqueWithoutGen (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR


#GAGA GAGA!	#Attributive
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 AttributiveVan

#GAGA GAGA!	#Plural
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem RegPluralDeclension

#GAGA GAGA!	#For irregular հիմակուան from հիմա
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanHima AdvZero
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanHima [:կ] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 

#GAGA GAGA!	#singular attributive
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanHima [:կ] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan


#GAGA GAGA!	#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#GAGA GAGA!	NounTimeVanHima [:կուան] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg PluralPossessiveDeclension



#############################
#############################
#############################
#############################
#Other irregulars

PATTERN NounDeclIrregArchaicVowelReduction
# մեջ մեջի միջի
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase  # Dir/LR
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase

# իշու
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionReducedDativeU  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefUDeclensionWithOvertcase  # Dir/LR

# միջեր մեջեր
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension # Dir/LR
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionBase NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension 

NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveInst   
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef # Dir/LR
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR
NounMonoArchaicVowelReductionReducedDativeU  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef # Dir/LR

PATTERN NounDeclIrregReduceNer
# for nouns like երկիր which reduce everywhere
# singular երկիր երկիրը
NounReduceBeforeNer NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?
# cased երկրի երկիրի
NounReduceBeforeNer NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase
NounReduceBeforeNer NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR
# plural երկրներ երկիրներ
NounReduceBeforeNer NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer RegNounPluralFormDeclension
NounReduceBeforeNer NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension # Dir/LR



PATTERN NounDeclIrregPolyWithN
# these are irregular nouns which are polysyllabic but include nasal liaison
# the only example in hye are words like այնպիսի which takes -n-i and -n-ner

# singular caseless is այնպիսի, այնպիսի-ն, այնպիսի-ս
NounIrregPolyNasal NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?

# singular cased takes a meaningless nasal ն before the case marker
# այնպիսի-ն-ից, այնպիսի-ն-ի-ն
NounIrregPolyNasal NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 NominalNasal CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase

# plural takes nasal before ner, and the rest is normal
NounIrregPolyNasal NZero NouNinflBoundary  NominalNasal RegNounPluralFormDeclension



################################
################################
################################
################################
#Suffixal irregulars

PATTERN NounDeclUtjunSuffix
#paradigm of suffix ութիւն

#Singular caseless
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?  

#Singular archaic case dative
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseUtjunArchaicDat (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular regular case dative
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefI_OnlyGenDat   # Dir/LR

#Singular regular case oblique
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegIObliqueWithoutGenAndDefPoss
#Singular archaic case oblique
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (CaseUtjunArchaicAbl|CaseUtjunArchaicInst) (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

#Plural 
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension
#Archaic -ութեանց for plural genitive/dat
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary CaseUtjunArchaicPluralDatGen (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR
#GAGA GAGA!	#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#GAGA GAGA!	NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero	 NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PluralPossessiveDeclension


#attributive, arak included թեանիս
NounUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveUtjun

PATTERN NounDeclUmSuffix
#pattern for suffix ում

#Singular caseless ծագում
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case dative ծագման
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefDatGenArchaicAn
#Singular regular  dative case ծագումի
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefI_OnlyGenDat   # Dir/LR
# singular regular oblique case ծագումից ծագումով
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegIObliqueWithoutGenAndDefPoss
#Singular archaic instrument cases like ուսմանից ուսմամբ
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn CaseRegIObliqueWithoutGenAndDefPoss # Dir/LR
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InstArchaicAmp (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR



#Plural (already know it's polysyllabic)
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension

#GAGA GAGA!	#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#GAGA GAGA!	NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg PluralPossessiveDeclension


#attributive,
NounUmSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveUm 
# NounUmSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveUm # already in the plural


######################
#####################
##### Archaic declensions on nouns

PATTERN NounDeclOldAnForm
#These are nouns which can take -ան in the dative
#The -an form is rather antiquated and with only a few words
#The -an then triggers arbitrary reduction
#The words should have a regular version in the regular list
# There are subcategories based on reduction EANC: գառ, գառան, գառնից vs գարուն գարնան գարունից
#GAGA GAGA!	# can also do unreduced nouns like կողմ կողման կողմանէ
#GAGA GAGA!	# Can have ամբ forms in instrumental
